Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.34, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. In lieu of issuing new registration plates each registration year for a vehicle renewing registration, the department may reassign the registration plates previously issued to the vehicle and may adopt and prescribe an annual validation sticker indicating payment of annual registration fees. The department shall issue one validation sticker for each set of registration plates. The sticker shall must specify the month and year of expiration of the registration plates. The sticker shall be displayed only on the rear registration plate, except that the sticker shall be displayed on the front registration plate of a truck tractor. A validation sticker issued for the upcoming registration year prior to the expiration of the applicable current registration year does not invalidate the registration, and is not required to be displayed on the registered vehicleâs registration plate Senate File 257, p. 2 until the owner would be considered to be driving a motor vehicle with an expired registration under section 321.39. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 257, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor